Utah statutes.
17D-2-405.   Default under a lease agreement.
If a local entity fails to pay a lease payment due to a local building
authority under a lease agreement:
(1)  the local entity shall immediately quit and vacate the project;
(2)  the local entity's lease payment obligation under the lease agreement
terminates; and
(3)  the local building authority may immediately lease the project according
to the provisions of:
(a)  the proceeding under which bonds to fund the project were authorized; and
(b)  any mortgage given to secure the bonds.
